Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4121.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-16105, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-16105. Appeal of valuation or legal classification from county assessor to county board A. If the county assessor denies all or part of a petition under section 42-16055, and if a county board of equalization has been established in the county, the petitioner may appeal the assessor's decision to the county board by filing with the clerk of the county board, within twenty-five days after the date that the assessor's decision was mailed to the petitioner, a copy of the written basis of the decision according to the instructions on the petition.  The petitioner shall send a copy of the petition filed with the clerk of the county board to the county assessor by certified mail.  The department shall adopt standard instructions for the county assessor to include with the county assessor's decision, in both physical and digital formats, to inform the petitioner of the requirement to send a copy of the petition to the county assessor. B. The department may contest any proposed valuation or classification or any proposed change in valuation or classification before the county board. If, in the director's opinion, a decision of an assessor is erroneous, the director may appeal the assessor's decision to the county board within twenty-five days after the assessor's decision was mailed to the taxpayer and the department. In such an action the taxpayer shall raise any defense the taxpayer has to liability for the tax and any additional tax sought to be imposed. If issues other than valuation or classification are raised by either party, the action shall be tried as if it were an action pursuant to section 42-11005 or 42-11052. C. A property owner that receives a notice of valuation under section 42-15105 may appeal the valuation or legal classification to the county board as provided in subsection A of this section within twenty-five days after the date of the assessor's notice. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 42-16157, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-16157. Appeal of valuation or legal classification from county assessor to state board of equalization A. Except as provided in subsection C or D of this section, if the county assessor denies all or part of a petition under section 42-16055, and if a county board of equalization is not established in the county where the property is located, the petitioner may appeal the assessor's decision to the state board of equalization by filing with the state board, within twenty-five days after the date that the assessor's decision was mailed to the petitioner, a copy of the written basis of the decision according to the instructions on the petition.  The petitioner shall send a copy of the petition filed with the state board to the county assessor by certified mail. B. The department may contest any proposed valuation or classification or any proposed change in valuation or classification before the state board. If, in the director's opinion, a decision of an assessor is erroneous, the director may appeal the assessor's decision to the state board within twenty-five days after the assessor's decision was mailed to the taxpayer and the department. In such an action the taxpayer shall raise any defense the taxpayer has to liability for the tax and any additional tax sought to be imposed. If issues other than valuation or classification are raised by either party, the action shall be tried as if it were an action pursuant to section 42-11005 or 42-11052. C. A property owner who receives a notice of valuation under section 42-15105 may appeal the valuation or legal classification to the state board as provided in subsection A of this section within twenty-five days after the date of the assessor's notice. D. A property owner whose petition is denied, in whole or in part, pursuant to section 42-19051 may only appeal the valuation or legal classification to the state board as provided in subsection A of this section within twenty days after the date of the assessor's notice of refusal or decision. E. The state board may contract with any county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons according to the most recent United States decennial census to review and hold hearings and make decisions on petitions filed under section 42-16105. These hearings shall be conducted in the county in which the property of the subject hearings is located. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 42-16158, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-16158. Appeal of valuation or legal classification from department to state board A. A property owner who is not satisfied with the valuation or legal classification of the property as determined by the department may appeal to the state board by filing a petition with the state board that is postmarked on or before October 1 or within fifteen days after the department mails its decision to the property owner, whichever date is later. The state board shall prescribe the form of and procedure for filing the petition by administrative rule.  The property owner shall send a copy of the petition filed with the state board to the department by certified mail. B. The state board shall notify the petitioner of the time and place of the hearing. The petitioner: 1. May appear before the state board at such time as the state board may direct. 2. Is entitled to be heard at any hearing regarding the valuation or legal classification of the property. 3. Shall show cause why the valuation or legal classification should be changed. C. If the state board orders the valuation or legal classification to be changed, it shall immediately transmit a copy of the order to the property owner and to the officers of this state and the county, city or town in charge of tax assessments who shall correct the tax roll accordingly. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 42-16252, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-16252. Notice of proposed correction; response; petition for review; appeal A. Subject to the limitations and conditions prescribed by this article, if a tax officer determines that any real or personal property has been assessed improperly as a result of a property tax error, the tax officer shall send the taxpayer a notice of proposed correction at the taxpayer's last known address by: 1. Certified mail, return receipt requested, if correction of the error results in an increase in the full cash value or change in legal classification of the property. 2. First class mail or, at the taxpayer's written request, delivery by common carrier or electronic transmittal, if correction of the error does not result in an increase in the valuation of the property. B. The notice shall: 1. Be in a form prescribed by the department. 2. Clearly identify the subject property by tax parcel number or tax roll number and the year or years for which the correction is proposed. 3. Explain the error, the reasons for the error and the proposed correction of the error. 4. Inform the taxpayer of the procedure and deadlines for appealing all or part of the proposed determination before the tax roll is corrected. C. Within thirty days after receiving a notice of proposed correction, the taxpayer may file a written response to the tax officer that sent the notice to either consent to or dispute the proposed correction of the error and to state the grounds for disputing the correction. A failure to file a written response within thirty days constitutes consent to the proposed correction.  A taxpayer may file a request for an extension of time within thirty days after receiving the notice of proposed correction. The extension of time may not exceed thirty days. If an extension is granted, any response that is not filed within the extended due date constitutes consent to the proposed correction. D. The taxpayer may appeal any valuation or legal classification issue that arises from the proposed correction as provided in this section. E. If the taxpayer consents to the proposed correction, or consents to the proposed correction but disputes the proposed valuation or legal classification as provided on the form prescribed by the department, the tax roll shall be promptly corrected to allow property taxes to be levied and collected in all subsequent tax years, but no any additional tax, interest or penalty may not be imposed for the current tax year or any tax year preceding the date of the notice of proposed correction. F. If the taxpayer disputes the proposed correction or the proposed valuation or legal classification, the tax officer shall meet with the taxpayer or the taxpayer's representative in any case in which the taxpayer has timely filed a written response to discuss the proposed correction.  If after the meeting the tax officer and the taxpayer reach an agreement on all or part of the proposed correction, the tax officer and the taxpayer shall each sign an agreement and the tax roll must be promptly corrected to the extent agreed on. G. If after the meeting the parties fail to agree on all or part of the proposed correction, the tax officer shall serve a notice on the taxpayer by certified mail within thirty days after the meeting date advising the taxpayer that the tax roll will be corrected to the extent agreed on.  The taxpayer may file a petition on a form prescribed by the department with the board of equalization and shall send a copy of the petition to the tax officer by certified mail.  The petition must be filed with the board within thirty days after the date of the notice or it is barred. On receiving the petition, the board shall hold a hearing on the disputed issues in the proposed correction within thirty days and shall issue a written decision pursuant to the board's rules. H. A party that is dissatisfied with the decision of the board may appeal the decision to court within sixty days after the date the board's decision is mailed, but any additional taxes that are determined to be due must be timely paid before delinquency for the court to retain jurisdiction of the matter. END_STATUTE